Montana, session 2025, SB15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 5-5-401, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-5-401. Officers liable to impeachment. The governor, executive officers, heads of state
departments, and judicial officers are liable to impeachment for felonies, AND MISDEMEANORS, and
misdemeanors or malfeasance in corruption, incompetence, negligence in the performance of one's duties,
willful neglect of duty, oppressive use of one's office, or misconduct in one's office."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 15